Utah statutes.
31A-27a-608.   Liquidator's recommendations to the receivership court.

(1)  The liquidator shall, from time to time as determined by the liquidator, present to the receivership court for approval, reports of claims settled or determined by the liquidator under Section 31A-27a-603.

(2)  A report required by this section shall include information identifying:

(a)  the claim;

(b)  the amount of the claim; and

(c)  the priority class of the claim.

